Illinois, session 104th, SB2673.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The amount of $243,900, or so much of that 5amount as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General 6Revenue Fund to Grand Tower Township in Jackson County, in 7addition to its Fiscal Year 2026 appropriation, for the 8purpose of paying Fiscal Year 2026 expenses. 9    Section 10. The amount of $117,300, or so much of that 10amount as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General 11Revenue Fund to Grand Tower Park District in Jackson County, 12in addition to its Fiscal Year 2026 appropriation, for the 13purpose of paying Fiscal Year 2026 expenses. 14    Section 15. The amount of $211,900, or so much of that 15amount as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General 16Revenue Fund to Grand Tower Road and Bridge District in 17Jackson County, in addition to its Fiscal Year 2026 18appropriation, for the purpose of paying Fiscal Year 2026 19expenses. 20    Section 20. The amount of $178,500, or so much of that 21amount as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General   SB2673- 2 -LRB104 14035 JDS 27167 b1Revenue Fund to Tower Rock Fire Protection District, in 2addition to its Fiscal Year 2026 appropriation, for the 3purpose of paying Fiscal Year 2026 expenses. 4    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 52025.